Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-179
National Guard; vouchers; payrolls; payment; warrants.

The Director of Administrative Services is hereby authorized and required on presentation of the proper vouchers and payrolls to draw his warrant on the state General Fund and against the appropriation made by the Legislature for the support and maintenance of the National Guard.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 61, p. 384;

R.S.1913, § 3960;

C.S.1922, § 3358;

C.S.1929, § 55-177;

R.S.1943, § 55-186;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 77, p. 1606.

Under former law Auditor of Public Accounts was required to issue warrant for rental of armory leased by Adjutant General, for which appropriation was made. Omaha Armory Building Co. v. Johnson, 119 Neb. 29, 226 N.W. 911 (1929).